Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.180.080

Allocation of moneys for bilingual instruction program.

Moneys appropriated by the legislature for the purposes of RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080 shall be allocated by the superintendent of public instruction to school districts for the sole purpose of operating an approved bilingual instruction program.

[ 2009 c 548 s 705; 1995 c 335 s 601; 1990 c 33 s 167; 1979 c 95 s 6. Formerly RCW 28A.58.810.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 548 ss 101-110 and 701-710: See note following RCW 28A.150.200.

Intent—2009 c 548: See RCW 28A.150.1981.

Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.410.270.

Intent—Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.305.130.

Part headings, table of contents not law—1995 c 335: See note following RCW 28A.150.360.

Severability—1979 c 95: See note following RCW 28A.180.010.